sv: Fagottens bocalsystem: Buffet (franskt system); Heckel (tyskt system); Universellt/ospecificerat; Övrigt
it: Sistema di bocchino per fagotto: Buffet (sistema francese); Heckel (sistema tedesco); Universale/Non specificato; Altro
ru: Система S-образной трубки фагота: Бюффе (французская система); Геккель (немецкая система); Универсальная / не указана; Другое
el: Σύστημα μπόκαλ φαγκότου: Buffet (γαλλικό σύστημα); Heckel (γερμανικό σύστημα); Γενικής χρήσης / μη καθορισμένο; Άλλο
pt-PT: Sistema de bocal de fagote: Buffet (sistema francês); Heckel (sistema alemão); Universal/não especificado; Outro
hu: Fagott bocal rendszere: Buffet (francia rendszer); Heckel (német rendszer); Univerzális/nem meghatározott; Egyéb
ja: ファゴットのボーカルシステム: ビュッフェ (フレンチシステム); ヘッケル (ジャーマンシステム); 汎用/未指定; その他
sk-SK: Systém krku fagotu: Buffet (francúzsky systém); Heckel (nemecký systém); Univerzálny/nešpecifikovaný; Iný
pt-BR: Sistema de bocal do fagote: Buffet (sistema francês); Heckel (sistema alemão); Universal/não especificado; Outros
da: Mundrør på fagotten: Buffet (fransk system); Heckel (tysk system); Universal/uspecificeret; Andet
ro-RO: Sistemul muștiucului fagotului: Buffet (sistem francez); Heckel (sistem german); Universal/nespecificat; Altele
vi: Hệ thống bocal kèn bassoon: Buffet (hệ Pháp); Heckel (hệ Đức); Phổ quát/không xác định; Khác
en: Bassoon bocal system: Buffet (French system); Heckel (German system); Universal/unspecified; Other
sl-SI: Sistem odmevnika za fagot: Buffet (francoski sistem); Heckel (nemški sistem); Univerzalno/neopredeljeno; Drugo
pl: System bocala fagotu: Buffet (system francuski); Heckel (system niemiecki); Uniwersalny/nieokreślony; Inny
nb: Fagott-bocalsystem: Buffet (fransk system); Heckel (tysk system); Universell/uspesifisert; Annet
th: ระบบโบคัลของบาสซูน: Buffet (ระบบฝรั่งเศส); Heckel (ระบบเยอรมัน); อเนกประสงค์/ไม่ระบุ; อื่นๆ
tr: Fagot bocal sistemi: Buffet (Fransız sistemi); Heckel (Alman sistemi); Evrensel/belirtilmemiş; Diğer
cs: Typ esíčka fagotu: Buffet (francouzský systém); Heckel (německý systém); Univerzální/nespecifikováno; Jiné
zh-TW: 低音管吹管系統: Buffet (法式系統); Heckel (德式系統); 通用/未指定; 其他
de: S-Bogensystem des Fagotts: Buffet (französisches System); Heckel (deutsches System); Universell/nicht spezifiziert; Sonstige
lt-LT: Fagoto bokalinė sistema: „Buffet“ (prancūziška sistema); „Heckel“ (vokiška sistema); Universali / nenurodyta; Kita
bg-BG: Фаготна бокална система: Buffet (френска система); Heckel (немска система); Универсална/неуточнена; Друго
zh-CN: 巴松管吹管系统: 布菲（法国体系）; 海克尔（德国体系）; 通用/未指定; 其他
ko: 바순 보칼 시스템: 뷔페(프랑스식 시스템); 헤켈(독일식 시스템); 범용/미지정; 기타
fr: Système de bocal du basson: Buffet (système français); Heckel (système allemand); Universel/non spécifié; Autre
nl: Fagot bocal systeem: Buffet (Frans systeem); Heckel (Duits systeem); Universeel/ongespecificeerd; Overig
es: Sistema de boquillas del fagot: Buffet (sistema francés); Heckel (sistema alemán); Universal/no especificado; Otro
hr-HR: Sustav puhačke cijevi za fagot: Buffet (francuski sustav); Heckel (njemački sustav); Univerzalno / nije navedeno; Ostalo
fi: Fagotin bocal-järjestelmä: Buffet (ranskalainen järjestelmä); Heckel (saksalainen järjestelmä); Yleinen/määrittelemätön; Muu